Oklahoma, session 2025, SB811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1175.6a, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1175.6a. A. If the person is found to be incompetent


prior to conviction because he or she is a person requiring


treatment as defined in Section 1-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma


Statutes, but capable of achieving competence with treatment within


a reasonable period of time as defined by Section 1175.1 of this


title, the court shall suspend the criminal proceedings and order


the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services to


provide treatment, therapy or training which is calculated to allow


the person to achieve competency. The Department may designate a


willing entity to provide such competency restoration services on

Req. No. 1097 Page 1


behalf of the Department, provided the entity has qualified


personnel. The court shall further order the Department to take


custody of the individual as soon as a forensic bed becomes


available, unless both the Department and the county jail where the


person is being held determine that it is in the best interests of


the person to remain in the county jail. Such competency


restoration services shall begin within a reasonable period of time


after the court has determined that the person is not competent to


stand trial.


The person shall remain in the custody of the county jail until


such time as the Department has a bed available at the forensic


facility unless competency restoration services are provided by a


designee of the Department, in which case custody of the person


shall be transferred to the Department.


The Department shall develop and implement a pilot program to


provide community-based competency restoration services as ordered


by the consent decree for Briggs V. Friesen, 23-cv-00081-GKF-JFJ.


B. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services


or designee shall make periodic reports to the court as to the


competency of the defendant.


C. If the person is determined by the Department of Mental


Health and Substance Abuse Services or designee to have regained


competency, or is no longer incompetent because the person is a



Req. No. 1097 Page 2


person requiring treatment as defined by Title 43A of the Oklahoma


Statutes, a hearing shall be scheduled within twenty (20) days:


1. If found competent by the court or a jury after such


rehearing, criminal proceedings shall be resumed;


2. If the person is found to continue to be incompetent because


the person is a person requiring treatment as defined in Title 43A


of the Oklahoma Statutes, the person shall be returned to the


custody of the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services or designee;


3. If the person is found to be incompetent because the person


is intellectually disabled as defined by Title 10 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, the court shall issue the appropriate order as set forth


in Section 1175.6b of this title;


4. If the person is found to be incompetent for reasons other


than the person is a person requiring treatment as defined by Title


43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, and other than the person is


intellectually disabled as defined in Title 10 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and is also found to be not dangerous as defined by


Section 1175.1 of this title, the court shall issue the appropriate


order as set forth in Section 1175.6b of this title; or


5. If the person is found to be incompetent for reasons other


than the person is a person requiring treatment as defined by Title


43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, and other than the person is


intellectually disabled as defined in Title 10 of the Oklahoma

Req. No. 1097 Page 3


Statutes, but is also found to be dangerous as defined by Section


1175.1 of this title, the court shall issue the appropriate order as


set forth in Section 1175.6c of this title.


D. If the person is found to be incompetent because the person


is a person requiring treatment as defined by Section 1-103 of Title


43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, but not capable of achieving


competence with treatment within a reasonable period of time as


defined by Section 1175.1 of this title, the court shall commence


civil commitment proceedings pursuant to Title 43A and shall dismiss


without prejudice the criminal proceeding. If the person is


subsequently committed to the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services pursuant to Title 43A, the statute of


limitations for the criminal charges which were dismissed by the


court shall be tolled until the person is discharged from the


Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services pursuant to


Section 7-101 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1097 DC 1/19/2025 5:43:55 AM



Req. No. 1097 Page 4